New Jersey, session 221, A4410.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  A newly-built development intended to be an inclusionary development, as defined in subsection f. of section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304), consisting of 10 or more units or four or more stories, shall only be constructed if it is designed, constructed, and certified to, at minimum, Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) silver standards, or an equivalent green building rating system standard as adopted by the United States Green Building Council, the Green Globes Program adopted by the Green Building Initiative, or a comparable nationally recognized, accepted, and appropriate sustainable development rating system. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a development for which a complete application for development is submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.  Prior to submitting an application for development for any newly-built inclusionary development, as defined in subsection f. of section 4 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-304), consisting of 10 units or more, the developer shall submit a report of the findings of the following studies to the approving authority of the municipality in which the development is to be located: (1) a traffic impact study; (2) a school impact study; and (3) a storm water impact study.  For any newly-built inclusionary development, the construction of which would require more than one acre of land to be cleared, the developer, prior to submitting an application for development, shall submit a report of the findings of a carbon impact study to the approving authority of the municipality in which the development is to be located. 3.  The Commissioner of Community Affairs, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, P.L.1968, c.140 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), and in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of Education, shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) on or before the first day of the eighth month next following enactment. 4.  This act shall take effect on or before the first day of the thirteenth month next following enactment, but the Department of Community Affairs and municipalities are authorized to take any anticipatory actions necessary to prepare for the implementation of the provisions of this act.